Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 8 State Militia

Cross references. —

As to state militia, see art. 17, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d Military and Civil Defense §§ 4, 30 to 45, 217.

Minor's right to wages or similar payments for enlistment or military service, 36 ALR2d 1018.

Computation of back pay and allowances to which member of armed forces is entitled upon showing that he was wrongfully separated from service, 7 ALR Fed 473.